Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB814.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "doula" means a trained professional who provides
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not medical care, to mothers
before, during, and after childbirth.
(2) The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with
which the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide
coverage for doula services if the doula has:
(a) Applied for and received a National Provider Identifier number from the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; and
(b) Completed enrollment as a Medicaid provider, as required by the
Department for Medicaid Services.
(3) In order to be eligible to enroll as a Medicaid provider, the Department for
Medicaid Services shall require a doula to provide at least the following:
(a) Evidence of having completed the following:
1. A doula training course offered by the International Childbirth
Education Association, Doulas of North America, the Association of
Labor Assistants and Childbirth Educators, Birthworks, the Childbirth
and Postpartum Professional Association, Childbirth International,
the International Center for Traditional Childbearing, or
Commonsense Childbirth, or any other doula training course
approved by the Department for Medicaid Services;
2. At least twenty-four (24) contact hours of in-person education that
included any combination of childbirth education, birth doula
training, antepartum doula training, and postpartum doula training;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:17 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1808
3. At least one (1) breastfeeding class;
4. At least two (2) childbirth classes;
5. A cultural competency training course; and
6. A training course on client confidentiality and privacy;
(b) Proof of cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification for infants, children,
and adults; and
(c) At least one (1) positive reference from a licensed healthcare provider or a
licensed certified professional midwife as defined in KRS 314.400.
(4) The Department for Medicaid Services shall promulgate administrative
regulations necessary to carry out this section.
Section 2. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 1 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request any necessary
state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay full
implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Section 3. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and shall provide an update on the status of any application
or request submitted pursuant to Section 2 of this Act at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission or any committee thereof.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:17 AM Jacketed